apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="g/yte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oten</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytt</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ote</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytt</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otne</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytte</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otne</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytte</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytande</l> <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>     <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>     <r>yte</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytast</l>  <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ote</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytt</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yter</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yt</l>     <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aut</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytte</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="løn/ne__vblex_adj" c="-er/-te/-t">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nande</l> <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l><r>ne</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nast</l>  <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>   <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fen/ne__vblex_adj" c="-er/-de/-t">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nande</l> <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l><r>ne</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nast</l>  <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>   <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  
  <e c="v:"><p><l>t</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/enne__vblex_adj" c="-er/-de/-t; NPK prefers vende (vente); venne_venje.vb">
  <e>       <p><l>end</l>     <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>and</l>     <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>     <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ant</l>     <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ande</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ande</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ennande</l> <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>enjande</l> <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enn</l>     <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>en</l>     <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enn</l><r>enne</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>enj</l><r>enne</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ennast</l>  <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>     <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ant</l>     <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enner</l>   <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>en</l>      <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>    <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ande</l>    <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></e>
  
  <e c="v:"><p><l>t</l>     <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>enne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>te</l>    <r>enne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gyte">            <i>g</i><par n="g/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="begynne">     <i>begyn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påbegynne">   <i>påbegyn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forkynne"><i>forkyn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forvenne"><i>forv</i><par n="v/enne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lønne"><i>løn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prislønne"><i>prisløn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nenne"><i>nen</i><par n="fen/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prosentlønne"><i>prosentløn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="akkordlønne"><i>akkordløn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prisbelønne"><i>prisbeløn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tryte"><i>tr</i><par n="g/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="venne"><i>v</i><par n="v/enne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilvenne"><i>tilv</i><par n="v/enne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avvenne"><i>avv</i><par n="v/enne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fenne"><i>fen</i><par n="fen/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kynne"><i>kyn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grynne"><i>gryn</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skrinne"><i>skrin</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påminne">	<i>påmin</i><par n="løn/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="snikskryte">	<i>snikskr</i>	<par n="g/yte__vblex_adj"/> </e>
